Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Assessment for Promotion of Soybean Industry

247.510.
Promotion of soybean production and use in public interest.

It is declared to be in the interest of the public welfare that Kentucky farmers who are producers of soybeans shall be permitted and encouraged to act jointly and in cooperation with all producers, handlers, dealers and processors of soybeans in promoting and stimulating, by research, market development and education, the increased production, use and sale, domestic and foreign, of soybeans and soybean products.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 83, § 1.

247.515.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

247.510

to

247.595

unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Board” means the State Board of Agriculture;

“Producer” means every person who produces soybeans and thereafter causes the same to be marketed;

“New producer” means a producer who was not engaged in the business of producing soybeans at the time a referendum was conducted in accordance with the provisions of KRS

247.510

to

247.595

;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, cooperative, or other business entity;

“Marketing year” means from July 1 to June 30 of the following year;

“Purchaser” means any person, public or private corporation, federal commodity credit corporation, association, or partnership buying, accepting for shipment, or otherwise acquiring the property in or to soybeans from a producer, and shall include a mortgagee, pledgee, lienor, or other person, public or private, having a claim against the producer, when the actual or constructive possession of such soybeans is taken as part payment or in satisfaction of such mortgage, pledge, lien, or claim;

“Net market price” means the sales price or other value received by a producer for soybeans after adjustments have been made for any premium or discount based on grading or quality factors; and

“Promotion board” means the Kentucky Soybean Promotion Board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 83, § 2; 1986, ch. 180, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 45, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

247.520.
Association of dealers not illegal.

No association meeting or activity undertaken in pursuance of the provisions of KRS

247.510

to

247.595

and intended to benefit all of the producers, handlers, and processors of soybeans shall be deemed or considered illegal or in restraint of trade.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 83, § 3; 1986, ch. 180, § 2, effective July 15, 1986.

247.525.
Producers’ referendum levying assessment. [Repealed.]

247.530.
Application by association for certification and approval for assessment referendum — Publication.

Any existing association which is fairly representative of the soybean producers of Kentucky may, at any time after July 12, 2006, make application to the State Board of Agriculture on forms prescribed by the board for certification and approval for the purpose of conducting a referendum among the producers of soybeans upon the question of levying an assessment under the provisions of KRS

247.510

to

247.595

, and for collecting and utilizing the assessment for the purpose stated in the referendum.

The Commissioner shall publish the application through the medium of the public press in the state within ten (10) days of receipt of the application.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 83, § 5; 1986, ch. 180, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 2006, ch. 88, § 2, effective July 12, 2006.

247.535.
Certified association authorized to hold referendum — Referendum on area or statewide basis. [Repealed.]

247.540.
Referendum on area or statewide basis — Persons eligible to participate. [Repealed.]

247.545.
Supervision of referendum by Commissioner — Expenses.

The manner, conduct and management of any referendum held under the provisions of KRS

247.510

to

247.595

, shall be under the supervision and direction of the Commissioner of Agriculture, and any and all expenses in connection therewith shall be borne by the association conducting the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 83, § 8; 1986, ch. 180, § 4, effective July 15, 1986.

247.550.
Commissioner to determine date, hours, polling places, and details of assessment — Limits. [Repealed.]

247.552.
Limitation on assessment levied on soybeans marketed in Kentucky.

No assessment levied by any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.510

to

247.595

shall exceed the rate of one-fourth of one percent (0.25%) of the net market price per bushel on all soybeans marketed within the Commonwealth. The assessment shall be deducted from the amount paid the producer at the first point of sale.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 180, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 45, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2006, ch. 88, § 3, effective July 12, 2006.

247.553.
Assessment on soybeans for seed stock.

A first purchaser who purchases soybeans in accordance with a contract or otherwise with the intent of utilizing the soybeans for seed stock shall be responsible for remitting the assessment due on the soybeans as required by KRS

247.570

. The assessment shall be collected from the producer at the time of final settlement for the soybeans. The assessment on soybeans marketed for use as seed stock shall be based upon the percentage specified in KRS

247.552

, multiplied by the posted county price for soybeans on the day of settlement as posted at the local Farm Service Agency office for the county in which the first purchaser is located. No assessment shall be collected unless the assessment in KRS

247.552

is in force.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 45, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 2006, ch. 88, § 4, effective July 12, 2006.

247.555.
Rules governing holding of referendum prescribed by Commissioner — Notice.

The hours, voting places, rules and regulations for the referendum shall be established and determined by the Commissioner of Agriculture; the said referendum date, hours, voting places, rules and regulations with respect to the holding of the referendum shall be published by the Commissioner through the medium of the public press in the Commonwealth at least thirty (30) days before the holding of such referendum, and direct written notice thereof shall likewise be given to each county or area agent in any county covered by such referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 83, § 10; 1986, ch. 180, § 6, effective July 15, 1986.

247.560.
Preparation of question — Poll holders — Canvass and declaration of results.

The Commissioner of Agriculture shall likewise prepare and distribute in advance of such referendum the question to be presented to the voters and shall arrange for the necessary poll holders for conducting the referendum. Following such referendum and within ten (10) days thereafter the Commissioner shall canvass and publicly declare the result of such referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 83, § 11; 1982, ch. 360, § 71, effective July 15, 1982.

247.565.
Effect of affirmative vote. [Repealed.]

247.570.
Assessment remitted to promotion board — Records.

The assessment so deducted shall, on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the end of the month in which such soybeans are sold to the purchaser, be remitted by the purchaser to the promotion board. The books and records of all the purchasers of soybeans shall at all times be open for inspection by the promotion board’s collection and compliance officer or the Commissioner of Agriculture or his duly authorized agents during regular business hours.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 83, § 13; 1980, ch. 114, § 47, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 180, § 7, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 45, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

247.573.
Kentucky Soybean Promotion Board.

There is hereby established a Kentucky Soybean Promotion Board. The promotion board shall consist of four (4) members appointed by the Kentucky Soybean Association; two (2) members appointed by the Kentucky Farm Bureau Federation; one (1) member appointed by the Commissioner of Agriculture; the Kentucky director or directors who serve on the United Soybean Board; and the Kentucky director or directors who serve on the American Soybean Association. The appointments shall be for terms of two (2) fiscal years, a fiscal year running from July 1 to the following June 30, and each appointing body shall promptly file with the promotion board the names of its respective appointees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 45, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 2006, ch. 88, § 5, effective July 12, 2006.

247.575.
Fund utilization committee — Membership terms. [Repealed.]

247.576.
Power of promotion board to enter into agreement with Federal Commodity Credit Corporation.

The promotion board may enter into an agreement with the Federal Commodity Credit Corporation to collect the specified assessment on all soybeans pledged as collateral for a Commodity Credit Corporation price support loan or purchase by the Commodity Credit Corporation under its loan or purchase programs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 180, § 8, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 45, § 6, effective July 14, 1992.

247.580.
Use and disbursement of funds.

The funds, including donations from individuals, concerns, corporations, and grants from the state or governmental agencies, shall be used by the promotion board for the purpose of promoting and stimulating, by research, market development, and education, the increased use and sale, domestic and foreign, of soybeans and soybean products. These funds shall not be used to lobby as defined in KRS

6.611

. The promotion board may spend or disburse the necessary funds therefrom for administrative costs and expenses, but no more than fifteen percent (15%) of the funds collected in any marketing year shall be so utilized.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 83, § 15; 1992, ch. 45, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 67, effective September 16, 1993.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since Chapter 4 of Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.) contained
an emergency clause [§ 92] it became effective as a whole when the
Governor tendered the bill, which he had signed, to the Secretary of State
on February 18, 1993. However, section 87 (13) of Ch. 4 of Acts 1993 (1st
Ex. Sess.), provided that, except as provided in §§ 88, 89,
and 90, §§ 1-84 of the Act should become effective two hundred
ten (210) days after the effective date of the Act, September 16, 1993; other
subsections within § 87 establish a transition schedule with other
specific dates calculated from the effective date of the Act. Such schedule
is actually a listing of deadlines within which certain actions called for
in § 87 of the Act are to be completed. Such schedule is as follows:
“within 45 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before
April 5, 1993; “within 60 days of the effective date of the act”
= on or before April 19, 1993; “within 75 days of the effective date
of the act” = on or before May 4, 1993; “within 90 days of the
effective date of the act” = on or before May 19, 1993; “within
150 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before July 19, 1993;
“within 180 days of the effective date of the act” = on or before
August 17, 1993; “two hundred ten (210) days after the effective date
of the act” = September 16, 1993.

OAG 93-25

.

247.585.
Refund of assessment collected from producer.

Any producer upon and against whom the assessment shall have been levied and collected under the provisions of KRS

247.510

to

247.595

, if dissatisfied with the assessment and the result thereof, shall have the right to demand of and receive from the treasurer of the promotion board a refund of the assessment so collected from the producer; provided, the demand for refund is made in writing within ninety (90) days from the date on which the assessment is collected from the producer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 83, § 16; 1986, ch. 180, § 9, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 45, § 8, effective July 14, 1992.

247.590.
Annual review of program — Referendum required when — Termination. [Repealed.]

247.592.
Effect of federal Soybean Act on assessments levied under KRS 247.510 to 247.595.

Notwithstanding KRS

247.510

to

247.595

, no assessment levied under KRS

247.510

to

247.595

shall be effective as long as the federal Soybean Promotion, Research, and Consumer Information Act, 7

U.S.C. secs. 6301

to 6311, is in effect.

If the federal act is terminated or suspended, any assessment levied under KRS

247.510

to

247.595

shall become effective and shall be collected and utilized according to the provisions of KRS

247.510

to

247.595

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 88, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

247.595.
Injunction against violations.

Whenever in the judgment of the board or the duly certified association, a purchaser has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices that constitute a violation of any of the provisions of KRS

247.510

to

247.585

, the board or the duly certified association may make application to the Franklin Circuit Court for an order enjoining such act or acts or practices, and obtain a restraining order and preliminary injunction against such purchaser.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 83, § 18; 1986, ch. 180, § 10, effective July 15, 1986.